Washington statutes.
RCW 35.83.030

Cooperation in undertaking housing projects.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction or operation of housing projects located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any state public body may upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

(1) Dedicate, sell, grant, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses or any other rights or privileges therein to a housing authority or the federal government;

(2) Cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with housing projects;

(3) Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks or other places which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

(4) Plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of such state public body; make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances; any city or town also may change its map;

(5) Cause services to be furnished to the housing authority of the character which such state public body is otherwise empowered to furnish;

(6) Enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by such state public body of its powers relating to the repair, elimination or closing of unsafe, insanitary or unfit dwellings;

(7) Employ (notwithstanding the provisions of any other law) any funds belonging to or within the control of such state public body, including funds derived from the sale or furnishing of property or facilities to a housing authority, in the purchase of the bonds or other obligations of a housing authority; and exercise all the rights of any holder of such bonds or other obligations;

(8) Do any and all things, necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, construction or operation of such housing projects;

(9) Incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such state public body in exercising the powers granted in this chapter;

(10) Enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary), with a housing authority respecting action to be taken by such state public body pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter. Any law or statute to the contrary notwithstanding, any sale, conveyance, lease or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a state public body without appraisal, advertisement or public bidding: PROVIDED, There must be five days public notice given either by posting in three public places or publishing in the official county newspaper of the county wherein the property is located; and

(11) With respect to any housing project which a housing authority has acquired or taken over from the federal government and which the housing authority by resolution has found and declared to have been constructed in a manner that will promote the public interest and afford necessary safety, sanitation and other protection, no state public body shall require any changes to be made in the housing project or the manner of its construction or take any other action relating to such construction.

[ 1991 c 167 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.83.030. Prior: 1939 c 24 s 4; RRS s 6889-34. Formerly RCW 74.28.030.]